District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0194.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the “Foreclosure Moratorium and Homeowner Assistance Fund Coordination
Temporary Amendment Act of 2025”.
Sec. 2. Foreclosure moratorium.
(a)(1) From July 1, 2022, through September 30, 2022, no residential foreclosure may be
initiated or conducted under section 539 or section 95 of An Act To establish a code of law for
the District of Columbia, approved March 3, 1901 (31 Stat. 1274/1204; D.C. Official Code §§
42-815 and 42-816) (“section 539 or section 95”), no sale may be initiated or conducted under
section 313(c) of the Condominium Act of 1976, effective March 29, 1977 (D.C. Law 1-89; D.C.
Official Code § 42-1903.13(c)), and no judgment foreclosing the right of redemption shall be
entered under D.C. Official Code § 47-1378 if:


ENGROSSED ORIGINAL
(A) A homeowner or their representative applies for financial assistance to
cure a debt or default with funds from the Department of Housing and Community
Development’s DC Homeowner Assistance Fund (“DC HAF”), or a similar government fund
established to assist homeowners impacted by the COVID-19 public emergency or public health
emergency declared pursuant to the District of Columbia Public Emergency Act of 1980,
effective March 5, 1981 (D.C. Law 3-149; D.C. Official Code § 7-2301 et seq.) (“financial
assistance application”);
(B) The financial assistance application is under review, pending approval,
pending payment, or under appeal; and
(C) Proof of the financial assistance application status described in
subparagraph (B) of this paragraph is presented, as a paper copy or through an electronic
medium, including through communications facilitated by the online DC HAF application portal,
to the mortgage lender, condominium association, homeowners association, or tax sale
purchaser, or to an agent acting as a representative for any housing or financing entity to which
the homeowner is indebted.
(2)(A) Beginning on July 25, 2022, a mortgage lender, condominium association,
homeowners association, or tax sale purchaser, or an agent acting as a representative for any
housing or financing entity to which a homeowner is indebted, may begin to send notices to warn
of intention to initiate or continue foreclosure actions, but no foreclosure action described in


ENGROSSED ORIGINAL
paragraph (1) of this subsection may proceed prior to 30 days after a homeowner is first sent a
warning notice.
(B) Before September 30, 2022, all foreclosure notices and foreclosure
warning notices sent pursuant to subparagraph (A) of this paragraph shall:
(i) Be sent by postal and electronic mail to a homeowner’s last
known home and email address;
(ii) Inform the homeowner of DC HAF and the program’s potential
ability to cure eligible housing debts, including the specific type of debt or debts owed to the
entity sending the notice; and
(iii) Explain the September 30, 2022, deadline to apply to DC HAF
to delay or prevent further foreclosure action.
(C) After October 1, 2022, all foreclosure notices and foreclosure warning
notices sent pursuant to subparagraph (A) of this paragraph shall:
(i) Be sent by postal and electronic mail to a homeowner’s last
known home and email address; and
(ii) Inform the homeowner of DC HAF and the program’s potential
ability to cure eligible housing debts, including the specific type of debt or debts owed to the
entity sending the notice.
(D) If, prior to the effective date of the Foreclosure Moratorium and
Homeowner Assistance Fund Coordination Emergency Amendment Act of 2022, effective


ENGROSSED ORIGINAL
November 22, 2022 (D.C. Act 24-674; D.C. Official Code § 42-851.01), a mortgage lender,
condominium association, homeowners association, or tax sale purchaser, or an agent acting as a
representative for any housing or financing entity to which a homeowner is indebted sent a
notice of an intention to initiate, notice to initiate, or notice to continue foreclosure actions
without information about DC HAF, a new notice must be sent prior to the continuation of any
foreclosure action informing the homeowner of the availability of DC HAF and the program’s
potential ability to cure eligible housing debts, including the specific type of debt or debts owed
to the entity sending the notice;
(3) The Mayor, or the Mayor’s designee, shall ensure:
(A) A homeowner applying for DC HAF relief, or for similar government
funds established to assist homeowners impacted by the COVID-19 public emergency or public
health emergency declared pursuant to the District of Columbia Public Emergency Act of 1980,
effective March 5, 1981 (D.C. Law 3-149; D.C. Official Code § 7-2301 et seq.), is provided with
documentation in a timely and ongoing manner that will enable the applicant to present proof of
financial assistance application status as described in paragraph (1)(C) of this subsection; and
(B) Editable sample foreclosure warning notices that include information
about debt relief available through DC HAF are published on the DC HAF website for use by
housing or financing entities to which a homeowner may be indebted.
(b)(1) If a homeowner submitted a DC HAF financial assistance application prior to
September 30, 2022 and provided proof of the application status pursuant to subsection (a)(1)(C)


ENGROSSED ORIGINAL
of this section, and the application remains under review, pending approval, pending payment, or
under appeal as of September 30, 2022, until such time as DC HAF payments can be made or the
homeowner’s application is denied following appeal, if any, the homeowner shall not be subject
to a:
(A) Residential foreclosure initiated or conducted under section 539 or
section 95;
(B) Sale initiated or conducted under section 313(c) of the Condominium
Act of 1976, effective March 29, 1977 (D.C. Law 1-89; D.C. Official Code § 42- 1903.13(c)); or
(C) Judgment foreclosing the right of redemption under D.C. Official
Code § 47-1378.
(2) The Mayor shall make every effort to make DC HAF payments as quickly as
practicable to qualified homeowners, their representatives, or housing or financing entities to
100 which a homeowner is indebted to cure any debts or defaults eligible for assistance.
101 Sec. 3. Applicability.
102 This act shall apply as of October 16, 2024.
103 Sec. 4. Effective date.
104 (a) This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by
105 the Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto), a 30-day period of congressional review
106 as provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December


ENGROSSED ORIGINAL
107 24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(1)), and publication in the District of
108 Columbia Register.
109 (b) This act shall expire after 225 days of its having taken effect.